fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-A-D-maskasiy_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gên: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gên: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - maskasiy - ok : # -m animate dependent noun, fingernail; claw	AEW NDA2
     maskasiy+N+A+D+PxX+Sg: maskasiy
     maskasiy+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Sg: naskasiy
     maskasiy+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Sg: kaskasiy
     maskasiy+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Sg: naskasînân
     maskasiy+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Sg: kaskasînaw
     maskasiy+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Sg: kaskasîwâw
     
     maskasiy+N+A+D+PxX+Obv: maskasiya
     maskasiy+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Obv: naskasiya
     maskasiy+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Obv: kaskasiya
     maskasiy+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Obv: naskasînâna
     maskasiy+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Obv: kaskasînawa
     maskasiy+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Obv: kaskasîwâwa
     
     maskasiy+N+A+D+Px3Sg+Obv: waskasiya
     maskasiy+N+A+D+Px3Pl+Obv: waskasîwâwa
     maskasiy+N+A+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: waskasîyiwa


     maskasiy+N+A+D+PxX+Pl: maskasiyak
     maskasiy+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Pl: naskasiyak
     maskasiy+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Pl: kaskasiyak
     maskasiy+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Pl: naskasînânak
     maskasiy+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Pl: kaskasînawak
     maskasiy+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Pl: kaskasîwâwak

     maskasiy+N+A+D+PxX+Loc: maskasîhk
     maskasiy+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Loc: naskasîhk
     maskasiy+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Loc: kaskasîhk
     maskasiy+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Loc: naskasînâhk
     maskasiy+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Loc: kaskasînâhk
     maskasiy+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Loc: kaskasîwâhk

     maskasiy+N+A+D+Px3Sg+Loc: waskasîhk
     maskasiy+N+A+D+Px3Pl+Loc: waskasîwâhk
     maskasiy+N+A+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc: waskasîyihk

     maskasiy+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+PxX+Sg:      [maskasîs,     maskasîsis]
     maskasiy+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Sg:    [naskasîs,     naskasîsis]
     maskasiy+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Sg:    [kaskasîs,     kaskasîsis]
     maskasiy+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Sg:    [naskasîsinân, naskasîsisinân]
     maskasiy+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Sg:   [kaskasîsinaw, kaskasîsisinaw]
     maskasiy+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Sg:    [kaskasîsiwâw, kaskasîsisiwâw]

     maskasiy+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px3Sg+Obv:    [waskasîsa,     waskasîsisa]
     maskasiy+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px3Pl+Obv:    [waskasîsiwâwa, waskasîsisiwâwa]
     maskasiy+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: [waskasîsiyiwa, waskasîsisiyiwa]

     maskasiy+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+PxX+Pl:      [maskasîsak,     maskasîsisak]
     maskasiy+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Pl:    [naskasîsak,     naskasîsisak]
     maskasiy+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Pl:    [kaskasîsak,     kaskasîsisak]
     maskasiy+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Pl:    [naskasîsinânak, naskasîsisinânak]
     maskasiy+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Pl:   [kaskasîsinawak, kaskasîsisinawak]
     maskasiy+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Pl:    [kaskasîsiwâwak, kaskasîsisiwâwak]
